Maine, session 132, LD1094.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6406, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2009, c. 151, §6, is further
amended to read:
1. Prohibited acts. It is unlawful for any person whose license or right to obtain a
license is under suspension to:
A. Engage in any licensed activity;
B. Give another person permission to raise, lift, transfer or possess lobster traps or cars
marked with the suspended person's lobster and crab fishing license number or lobster
traps with buoys that carry the color design on file with the suspended license;
C. Assist a holder of a Class II lobster and crab fishing license as a crew member; or
E. For any violation occurring on or after the effective date of this paragraph, assist
any license holder as a crew member in any activity authorized by the suspended
license.; or
F. Hold a direct and substantial financial interest in any business that buys, possesses,
transports or sells elvers if that person has had that person's license or right to obtain a
license issued under section 6864 suspended or revoked.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6864, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2013, c. 492, §15, is further
amended to read:
1-A. Limits on issuance after February 1st. The department may not issue an elver
dealer's license or a supplemental license after February 1st of the current licensing year.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §6864, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Limits on issuance to same person. The department may not issue an elver
dealer's license or a supplemental license to a person using the same business address as a
person who has violated section 6404-K, subsection 1 for at least 5 years following the
violation.
Page 1 - 132LR0709(03)